Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.180

Suspension of marketing agreement or order upon advice of commodity board—Certain prerequisites waived.

The director may, upon the advice of the commodity board serving under any marketing agreement or order and without compliance with the provisions of RCW 15.65.050 through 15.65.170, suspend any such agreement or order or term or provision thereof for a period of not to exceed one year, if the director finds that such suspension will tend to effectuate the declared policy of this chapter. Any suspension of all or substantially all of a marketing agreement or order by the director shall not become effective until the end of the then current marketing season.

[ 2002 c 313 s 13; 1961 c 256 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.